Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB767.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1369.5. Gadsden flag plate.(a) Application and payment.--Upon application of any person, accompanied by a fee of $26 which shall be in addition to the annual registration fee, the department shall issue to the person a special Gadsden flag registration plate. The special registration plate may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds or a motorcycle.(b) Description of plate.--The plate shall include a depiction of the Gadsden flag with the words "Don't Tread On Me." The flag shall be yellow and contain the depiction of a 123456789101112131415161718 coiled timber rattlesnake.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0767PN0791 - 2 - 12